Washington statutes.
RCW 15.62.090

Notice, elections, referenda—Lists of apiarists, manufacturers, processors, and first handlers.

(1)(a) The director shall cause a list to be prepared of all apiarists, as defined in RCW 15.62.020, from the list of apiarists registered with the department under *RCW 15.60.030. A qualified person may, at any time, have his or her name placed on the list by registering with the department.

(b) The director shall cause a list to be prepared of manufacturers, processors, and first handlers. The list shall be prepared from any information the director has at hand or may readily obtain. A qualified person may, at any time, have his or her name placed on the list by notifying the department and providing such information as the department deems necessary to determine whether the person qualifies as a manufacturer, processor, or first handler under RCW 15.62.020.

(c) For all purposes of giving notice and conducting elections or referenda, the lists the director has on hand under this section, corrected up to the day next preceding the date for issuing notices or ballots, are, for purposes of this chapter, deemed to be the lists of all persons entitled to notice or to assent or dissent or to vote.

(2) Any person may file his or her name and address with the commission for the purpose of receiving notices regarding the activities of the commission. Persons who are not Washington residents but are active as affected persons in this state and who wish to be considered for appointment to position eleven on the commission may file their names with the director. A person desiring such consideration must supply such information as the director deems appropriate.

[ 1989 c 5 s 8.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 15.60.030 was repealed by 2000 c 100 s 8, effective June 30, 2001.